test/src/morphology/V-kamrded_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - kåˊmrded: # Verb 'to bow / kumartaa' - full paradigm
     kåˊmrded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kåˊmrdam
     kåˊmrded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kåˊmrdak
     kåˊmrded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kååˊmmard
     kåˊmrded+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kåˊmrdep
     kåˊmrded+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kåˊmrdeˊped
     kåˊmrded+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kåˊmrde 
     kåˊmrded+V+Ind+Prs+4: kåˊmrdet

     kåˊmrded+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kåˊmrdem
     kåˊmrded+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kåˊmrdiǩ
     kåˊmrded+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kåˊmrdi
     kåˊmrded+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [kåˊmrdim, kåˊmrdin]
     kåˊmrded+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kåˊmrdid
     kåˊmrded+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kåˊmrde
     kåˊmrded+V+Ind+Prt+4: kåˊmrdeš

     kåˊmrded+V+Pot+Sg1: kåˊmrdeˊžem
     kåˊmrded+V+Pot+Sg2: kåˊmrdeˊžiǩ
     kåˊmrded+V+Pot+Sg3: kåˊmrdež
     kåˊmrded+V+Pot+Pl1: [kåˊmrdeˊžep, kåˊmrdeˊžim]
     kåˊmrded+V+Pot+Pl2: kåˊmrdeˊžid 
     kåˊmrded+V+Pot+Pl3: kåˊmrdeˊže
     kåˊmrded+V+Pot+4: kåˊmrdeˊžet
     kåˊmrded+V+Pot+ConNeg: kåˊmrdeˊže

     kåˊmrded+V+Cond+Sg1: kåˊmrdeˊčem
     kåˊmrded+V+Cond+Sg2: kåˊmrdeˊčiǩ
     kåˊmrded+V+Cond+Sg3: kåˊmrdeˊči
     kåˊmrded+V+Cond+Pl1: [kåˊmrdeˊčim, kåˊmrdeˊčep]
     kåˊmrded+V+Cond+Pl2: kåˊmrdeˊčid
     kåˊmrded+V+Cond+Pl3: kåˊmrdeˊče
     kåˊmrded+V+Cond+4: kåˊmrdeˊčeš
     kåˊmrded+V+Cond+ConNeg: kåˊmrdeˊče

     kåˊmrded+V+Imp+Sg2: kååˊmmerd 
     kåˊmrded+V+Imp+Sg3: kåˊmrdââǥǥas
     kåˊmrded+V+Imp+Pl1: kåˊmrdâkap
     kåˊmrded+V+Imp+Pl2: kåˊmrdeˊǩed
     kåˊmrded+V+Imp+Pl3: kåˊmrdâkaz
     kåˊmrded+V+Imp+ConNeg: kåˊmrduku
     kåˊmrded+V+ActEss: kåˊmrdeˊmen
     kåˊmrded+V+Action: kåˊmrdam
     kåˊmrded+V+PrsPrc: kåˊmrdeei
     kåˊmrded+V+PrfPrc: [kåˊmrdam, kåˊmrdâmma]
     kåˊmrded+V+Pass+PrfPrc: [kåˊmrdummu, kåˊmrdum]
     kåˊmrded+V+VAbess: [kåˊmrdeǩâni, kåˊmrdeǩeânai]
     kåˊmrded+V+GerTemp: kåˊmrdeen
     kåˊmrded+V+GerInstr: kåˊmrdeeˊl
